hu: Szurkolói mez stílusa: Baseballmez; Kosárlabdamez; Krikettmez; Kerékpáros mez; Futballmez; Jégkorongmez; Motorsportmez; Rögbimez; Focimez; Edzőmez; Bemelegítő mez; Egyéb
fr: Type de maillot: Maillot de baseball; Maillot de basket-ball; Maillot de cricket; Maillot de cyclisme; Maillot de football américain; Maillot de hockey; Maillot de sport automobile; Maillot de rugby; Maillot de football; Maillot d’entraînement; Maillot d’échauffement; Autre
sl-SI: Stil dresa: Dres za bejzbol; Dres za košarko; Dres za kriket; Kolesarska majica; Dres za ameriški nogomet; Hokejski dres; Dres za motošport; Dres za ragbi; Nogometni dres; Dres za trening; Dres za ogrevanje; Drugo
nb: Genserstil: Baseball-trøye; Basketball-trøye; Cricket-trøye; Sykkeltrøye; Amerikansk fotball-trøye; Hockeytrøye; Motorsport-trøye; Rugbytrøye; Fotballtrøye; Treningstrøye; Oppvarmingstrøye; Annet
lt-LT: Megztinio stilius: Beisbolo marškinėliai; Krepšinio marškinėliai; Kriketo marškinėliai; Dviračių sporto marškinėliai; Amerikietiškojo futbolo marškinėliai; Ledo ritulio marškinėliai; Motosporto marškinėliai; Regbio marškinėliai; Futbolo marškinėliai; Treniruočių marškinėliai; Apšilimo marškinėliai; Kita
cs: Styl bundy: Baseballový dres; Basketbalový dres; Kriketový dres; Cyklistický dres; Fotbalový dres; Hokejový dres; Motorsportový dres; Ragbyový dres; Fotbalový dres; Tréninkový dres; Zahřívací dres; Jiné
pt-PT: Estilo da camisola: Camisola de basebol; Camisola de basquetebol; Camisola de críquete; Camisola de ciclismo; Camisola de futebol americano; Camisola de hóquei; Camisola de desportos motorizados; Camisola de râguebi; Camisola de futebol; Camisola de treino; Camisola de aquecimento; Outro
fi: Pelipaidan tyyli: Baseball-paita; Koripallopaita; Krikettipaita; Pyöräilypaita; Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon paita; Jääkiekkopaita; Moottoriurheilupaita; Rugby-paita; Jalkapallopaita; Treenipaita; Lämmittelypaita; Muu
vi: Kiểu dáng áo thể thao: Áo bóng chày; Áo bóng rổ; Áo cricket; Áo đua xe đạp; Áo bóng bầu dục; Áo khúc côn cầu; Áo đua xe; Áo bóng bầu dục (rugby); Áo bóng đá; Áo tập; Áo khởi động; Khác
zh-CN: 球衣款式: 棒球球衣; 篮球球衣; 板球球衣; 自行车骑行服; 橄榄球球衣; 冰球球衣; 赛车服; 橄榄球服; 足球球衣; 训练球衣; 热身球衣; 其他
es: Estilo de camiseta: Camiseta de béisbol; Camiseta de baloncesto; Camiseta de críquet; Camiseta de ciclismo; Camiseta de fútbol americano; Camiseta de hockey; Camiseta de deportes de motor; Camiseta de rugby; Camiseta de fútbol; Camiseta de entrenamiento; Camiseta de calentamiento; Otra
pt-BR: Estilo do paletó: Camisa de beisebol; Regata de basquete; Camisa de críquete; Camisa de ciclismo; Camisa de futebol americano; Camisa de hóquei; Camisa de automobilismo; Camisa de rugby; Camisa de futebol; Camisa de treino; Camisa de aquecimento; Outra
en: Jersey style: Baseball jersey; Basketball jersey; Cricket jersey; Cycling jersey; Football jersey; Hockey jersey; Motorsport jersey; Rugby jersey; Soccer jersey; Training jersey; Warm-up jersey; Other
da: Jersey-stil: Baseball-trøje; Basketball-trøje; Cricket-trøje; Cykeltrøje; Amerikansk fodboldtrøje; Hockeytrøje; Motorsportstrøje; Rugbytrøje; Fodboldtrøje; Træningstrøje; Opvarmningstrøje; Andet
sk-SK: Štýl dresu: Bejzbalový dres; Basketbalový dres; Kriketový dres; Cyklistický dres; Dres na americký futbal; Hokejový dres; Dres na motošport; Ragbyový dres; Futbalový dres; Tréningový dres; Zahrievací dres; Iné
tr: Forma stili: Beyzbol forması; Basketbol forması; Kriket forması; Bisiklet forması; Amerikan futbolu forması; Hokey forması; Motor sporları forması; Ragbi forması; Futbol forması; Antrenman forması; Isınma forması; Diğer
bg-BG: Стил спортни фланелки: Бейзболна фланелка; Баскетболна фланелка; Фланелка за крикет; Колоездачна фланелка; Фланелка за американски футбол; Хокейна фланелка; Фланелка за моторни спортове; Ръгби фланелка; Футболна фланелка; Тренировъчна фланелка; Фланелка за загрявка; Друго
hr-HR: Stil dresa: Dres za bejzbol; Dres za košarku; Dres za kriket; Biciklistički dres; Dres za američki nogomet; Dres za hokej; Moto dres; Dres za ragbi; Nogometni dres; Dres za trening; Dres za zagrijavanje; Ostalo
sv: Jersey-modell: Basebolltröja; Baskettröja; Crickettröja; Cykeltröja; Amerikansk fotbollströja; Hockeytröja; Motorsportströja; Rugbytröja; Fotbollströja; Träningströja; Uppvärmningströja; Annat
nl: Jersey stijl: Honkbalshirt; Basketbalshirt; Cricketshirt; Wielershirt; American football-shirt; Hockeyshirt; Motorsportshirt; Rugbyshirt; Voetbalshirt; Trainingsshirt; Warming-upshirt; Overig
zh-TW: 球衣款式: 棒球球衣; 籃球球衣; 板球球衣; 自行車車衣; 美式足球球衣; 曲棍球球衣; 賽車車衣; 橄欖球球衣; 足球球衣; 訓練球衣; 熱身球衣; 其他
ko: 저지 스타일: 야구 저지; 농구 저지; 크리켓 저지; 사이클링 저지; 미식축구 저지; 하키 저지; 모터스포츠 저지; 럭비 저지; 축구 저지; 트레이닝 저지; 웜업 저지; 기타
ru: Стиль пуловера: Бейсбольное джерси; Баскетбольное джерси; Джерси для крикета; Велосипедное джерси; Джерси для американского футбола; Хоккейное джерси; Мотоджерси; Регбийное джерси; Футбольное джерси; Тренировочное джерси; Разминочное джерси; Другое
ro-RO: Stil de tricou: Tricou de baseball; Tricou de baschet; Tricou de crichet; Tricou de ciclism; Tricou de fotbal american; Tricou de hochei; Tricou de motorsport; Tricou de rugby; Tricou de fotbal; Tricou de antrenament; Tricou de încălzire; Altele
de: Stil des Trikots: Baseball-Trikot; Basketball-Trikot; Cricket-Trikot; Fahrradtrikot; Football-Trikot; Eishockey-Trikot; Motorsport-Trikot; Rugby-Trikot; Fußball-Trikot; Trainings-Trikot; Aufwärm-Trikot; Sonstige
pl: Styl koszulki: Koszulka baseballowa; Koszulka koszykarska; Koszulka do krykieta; Koszulka rowerowa; Koszulka futbolowa; Bluza hokejowa; Koszulka motosportowa; Koszulka do rugby; Koszulka piłkarska; Koszulka treningowa; Koszulka rozgrzewkowa; Inny
it: Stile jersey: Maglia da baseball; Maglia da basket; Maglia da cricket; Maglia da ciclismo; Maglia da football; Maglia da hockey; Maglia per sport motoristici; Maglia da rugby; Maglia da calcio; Maglia da allenamento; Maglia da riscaldamento; Altro
el: Στυλ φανέλας: Φανέλα μπέιζμπολ; Φανέλα μπάσκετ; Φανέλα κρίκετ; Φανέλα ποδηλασίας; Φανέλα αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Φανέλα χόκεϊ; Φανέλα μηχανοκίνητου αθλητισμού; Φανέλα ράγκμπι; Φανέλα ποδοσφαίρου; Φανέλα προπόνησης; Φανέλα προθέρμανσης; Άλλο
th: รูปแบบเสื้อเจอร์ซีย์: เสื้อเบสบอล; เสื้อบาสเกตบอล; เสื้อคริกเก็ต; เสื้อจักรยาน; เสื้ออเมริกันฟุตบอล; เสื้อฮอกกี้; เสื้อแข่งรถมอเตอร์สปอร์ต; เสื้อรักบี้; เสื้อฟุตบอล; เสื้อฝึกซ้อม; เสื้อวอร์ม; อื่นๆ
ja: ジャージスタイル: 野球用ジャージ; バスケットボール用ジャージ; クリケット用ジャージ; サイクリング用ジャージ; アメリカンフットボール用ジャージ; ホッケー用ジャージ; モータースポーツ用ジャージ; ラグビー用ジャージ; サッカー用ジャージ; トレーニング用ジャージ; ウォームアップ用ジャージ; その他